District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.04

Initiation by Office of the Attorney General of support proceeding under Convention.

(a)

In a support proceeding under this subchapter, the Office of the Attorney General shall:

(1)

Transmit and receive applications; and

(2)

Initiate or facilitate the institution of a proceeding regarding an application in a tribunal of the District.

(b)

The following support proceedings are available to an obligee under the Convention:

(1)

Recognition or recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order;

(2)

Enforcement of a support order issued or recognized in the District;

(3)

Establishment of a support order if there is no existing order, including, if necessary, determination of parentage of a child;

(4)

Establishment of a support order if recognition of a foreign support order is refused under § 46-357.08(b)(2), (4), or (9);

(5)

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of the District; and

(6)

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

(c)

The following support proceedings are available under the Convention to an obligor against which there is an existing support order:

(1)

Recognition of an order suspending or limiting enforcement of an existing support order of a tribunal of the District;

(2)

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of the District; and

(3)

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

(d)

A tribunal of the District may not require security, bond, or deposit, however described, to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses in proceedings under the Convention.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 704, 63 DCR 222

History